Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.370

Watering, feeding facilities—Unlawful acts.

Pens used to hold livestock for a period of twenty-four hours or more in a public livestock market shall have watering and feeding facilities for livestock held in such pens. It shall be unlawful for a public livestock market to hold livestock for a period longer than twenty-four hours without feeding and watering such livestock. An operator of a public livestock market may also refuse to accept the consignment of any livestock that the licensee may believe to have been inadequately fed or otherwise inadequately cared for prior to the delivery of the livestock in question to the public livestock market.

[ 1991 c 17 s 2; 1959 c 107 s 37.]